Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0205

"Bingo."

"Bingo," as used in this chapter, means a game in which prizes are awarded on the basis of designated numbers or symbols on a card conforming to numbers or symbols selected at random and in which no cards are sold except at the time and place of the game, when the game is conducted by a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization, or if an agricultural fair authorized under chapters 15.76 and 36.37 RCW, which does not conduct bingo on more than twelve consecutive days in any calendar year, and except in the case of any agricultural fair as authorized under chapters 15.76 and 36.37 RCW, no person other than a bona fide member or an employee of said organization takes any part in the management or operation of said game, and no person who takes any part in the management or operation of said game takes any part in the management or operation of any game conducted by any other organization or any other branch of the same organization, unless approved by the commission, and no part of the proceeds thereof inure to the benefit of any person other than the organization conducting said game. The bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization must be principally located in the state of Washington and may not be approved for more than three licenses to conduct bingo activities.

[ 2023 c 155 s 1; 2002 c 369 s 1; 1987 c 4 s 3. Formerly RCW 9.46.020(2).]